District of Columbia statutes.
32-131.08

Prohibited acts.

(a)

A person shall not interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of, or the attempt to exercise, any right provided by this chapter.

(b)

An employer shall not discharge or discriminate in any manner against an employee because the employee:

(1)

Opposes any practice by an employer made unlawful by this chapter;

(2)

Pursuant or related to this chapter:

(A)

Complains to the employer;

(B)

Files a complaint with the Department of Employment Services;

(C)

Files a civil or administrative complaint alleging a violation of any provision of this chapter;

(D)

Informs any person about an employer’s alleged violation of this chapter;

(E)

Cooperates with the Department of Employment Services or another person’s investigation or prosecution of any alleged violation of this chapter;

(F)

Opposes any policy, practice, or act that is a violation of this chapter; or

(G)

Informs any person of his or her rights under this chapter.

(3)

Gives any information or testimony in connection with an inquiry or proceeding related to this chapter; or

(4)

Uses paid leave provided under this chapter.

(c)

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit an employer from establishing and enforcing a lawful policy relating to improper use of paid leave or from seeking more frequent certifications from an employee if there is evidence of a pattern of abuse of paid leave.

(d)

An employer taking an adverse action against an employee within 90 days of any of the actions set forth in subsection (b)(2) of this section shall raise a rebuttable presumption that the employer has violated this chapter.

(e)

It shall be unlawful for an employer’s absence control policy to count paid leave taken under this chapter as an absence that may lead to, or result in, discipline, discharge, demotion, suspension, or other adverse action.

History

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-152, § 9, 55 DCR 3452
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-89, § 2(d), 61 DCR 317
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-157, § 4(b), 61 DCR 10157

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-131.02.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-89 rewrote (b)(2); and added (d) and (e).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-157 substituted “civil or administrative complaint” for “civil complaint” in (b)(2)(C); and substituted “a violation of this chapter” for “unlawful under this chapter” in (b)(2)(F).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-240, March 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1332).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-89: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-89 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-89 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7003, effective Feb. 26, 2015.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-157: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-157 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014, and that the act shall apply to violations occurring after October 1, 2014.